Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.44.150

Unclaimed dividends—Disposition.

Any dividends to depositors or other creditors of such bank remaining uncalled for and unpaid in the hands of the director for six months after order of final distribution, shall be deposited in a bank to his or her credit, in trust for the benefit of the persons entitled thereto and subject to the supervision of the court shall be paid by him or her to them upon receipt of satisfactory evidence of their right thereto.

All moneys so deposited remaining unclaimed for five years after deposit shall escheat to the state for the benefit of the permanent school fund and shall be paid by the director into the state treasury. It shall not be necessary to have the escheat adjudged in a suit or action.

[ 2014 c 37 s 231; 1994 c 92 s 119; 1955 c 33 s 30.44.150. Prior: 1923 c 115 s 11; 1917 c 80 s 71; RRS s 3278. Formerly RCW 30.44.150.]